Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.370

District budget—State funds, allocation of—District general expense fund—Created, deposits, expenditures.

The superintendent of public instruction shall examine and revise the biennial budget request of each educational service district and shall fix the amount to be requested in state funds for the educational service district system from the legislature. Once funds have been appropriated by the legislature, the superintendent of public instruction shall fix the annual budget of each educational service district and shall allocate quarterly the state's portion from funds appropriated for that purpose to the county treasurer of the headquarters county of the educational service district for deposit to the credit of the educational service district general expense fund.

In each educational service district, there shall be an educational service district general expense fund into which there shall be deposited such moneys as are allocated by the superintendent of public instruction under provisions of this chapter and other funds of the educational service district, and such moneys shall be expended according to the method used by first or second-class school districts, whichever is deemed most feasible by the educational service district board. No vouchers for warrants other than moneys being distributed to the school districts shall be approved for expenditures not budgeted by the educational service district board.

[ 1983 c 56 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 31; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 22; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 14. Formerly RCW 28A.21.140, 28.19.565.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 56: See note following RCW 28A.195.010.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—Rights preserved—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.